Illinois, session 104th, SB2836.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Governmental Account Audit Act is amended 5by changing Sections 1, 3, and 6 as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 310/1)  (from Ch. 85, par. 701)7    Sec. 1. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the 8context otherwise indicates:9    "Governmental unit" or "unit" includes all municipal 10corporations in and political subdivisions of this State that 11appropriate more than $5,000 for a fiscal year, with the 12amount to increase or decrease by the amount of the Consumer 13Price Index (CPI) as reported on January 1 of each year, except 14the following:15        (1) School districts.16        (2) Cities, villages, and incorporated towns subject 17    to the Municipal Auditing Law, as contained in the 18    Illinois Municipal Code, and cities that file a report 19    with the Comptroller under Section 3.1-35-115 of the 20    Illinois Municipal Code.21        (3) Counties with a population of 1,000,000 or more.22        (4) Counties subject to the County Auditing Law.23        (5) Any other municipal corporations in or political   SB2836 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17498 RTM 30924 b1    subdivisions of this State, the accounts of which are 2    required by law to be audited by or under the direction of 3    the Auditor General.4        (6) (Blank).5        (7) A drainage district, established under the 6    Illinois Drainage Code (70 ILCS 605), that did not receive 7    or expend any moneys during the immediately preceding 8    fiscal year or obtains approval for assessments and 9    expenditures through the circuit court.10        (8) Public housing authorities that submit financial 11    reports to the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban 12    Development.13    "Governing body" means the board or other body or officers 14having authority to levy taxes, make appropriations, authorize 15the expenditure of public funds or approve claims for any 16governmental unit.17    "Comptroller" means the Comptroller of the State of 18Illinois.19    "Consumer Price Index" means the Consumer Price Index for 20All Urban Consumers for all items published by the United 21States Department of Labor.22    "Audit report" means the written report of the auditor and 23all appended statements and schedules relating to that report, 24presenting or recording the findings of an examination or 25audit of the financial transactions, affairs, or conditions of 26a governmental unit.  SB2836 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 17498 RTM 30924 b1    "Auditor" means a licensed certified public accountant, as 2that term is defined in Section 0.03 of the Illinois Public 3Accounting Act, or the substantial equivalent of a licensed 4CPA, as provided under Section 5.2 of the Illinois Public 5Accounting Act, who performs an audit of governmental unit 6financial statements and records and expresses an assurance or 7disclaims an opinion on the audited financial statements. 8    "Report" includes both audit reports and reports filed 9instead of an audit report by a governmental unit receiving 10revenue of less than $1,400,000 $850,000 during any fiscal 11year to which the reports relate.12    "Generally accepted accounting principles" means 13accounting principles generally accepted in the United States. 14    "Generally accepted auditing standards" means auditing 15standards generally accepted in the United States. 16(Source: P.A. 100-837, eff. 8-13-18; 101-419, eff. 1-1-20.) 17    (50 ILCS 310/3)  (from Ch. 85, par. 703)18    Sec. 3. Beginning with fiscal year 2027, any Any 19governmental unit receiving revenue of less than $1,400,000 20for any $850,000 for any fiscal year shall, in lieu of 21complying with the requirements of Section 2 for audits and 22audit reports, beginning with fiscal year 2016, either: (i) 23cause an audit of the accounts of the unit to be made once 24every 4 years and file with the Comptroller an annual 25financial report containing information required by the   SB2836 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 17498 RTM 30924 b1Comptroller, or (ii) file with the Comptroller an annual 2financial report containing information required by the 3Comptroller, a copy of which has been provided to each member 4of that governmental unit's board of elected officials, 5presented either in person or by a live phone or web connection 6during a public meeting, and approved by a 3/5 majority vote. 7In addition, a governmental unit receiving revenue of less 8than $1,400,000 $850,000 may file with the Comptroller any 9audit reports which may have been prepared under any other 10law. Beginning with fiscal year 2027, any Any governmental 11unit receiving revenue of $1,400,000 $850,000 or more for any 12fiscal year shall, in addition to complying with the 13requirements of Section 2 for audits and audit reports, file 14with the Comptroller the annual financial report required by 15this Section. Such annual financial reports shall be on forms 16so designed by the Comptroller as not to require professional 17accounting services for its preparation. All reports to be 18filed with the Comptroller under this Section must be 19submitted electronically and the Comptroller must post the 20reports on the Internet no later than 45 days after they are 21received. If the governmental unit provides the Comptroller's 22Office with sufficient evidence that the report cannot be 23filed electronically, the Comptroller may waive this 24requirement. The Comptroller must also post a list of 25governmental units that are not in compliance with the 26reporting requirements set forth in this Section.   SB2836 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 17498 RTM 30924 b1    Any financial report under this Section shall include the 2name of the purchasing agent who oversees all competitively 3bid contracts. If there is no purchasing agent, the name of the 4person responsible for oversight of all competitively bid 5contracts shall be listed. 6(Source: P.A. 97-890, eff. 8-2-12; 97-1142, eff. 12-28-12; 798-1019, eff. 7-1-15.) 8    (50 ILCS 310/6)  (from Ch. 85, par. 706)9    Sec. 6. When the audit is completed the auditor making 10such audit shall make and sign at least 3 copies of the report 11of the audit and immediately file them with the governmental 12unit audited. Beginning with fiscal year 2027, governmental 13Governmental units receiving revenue of $1,400,000 $850,000 or 14more for any fiscal year shall immediately make one copy of the 15audit report and one copy of the financial report required by 16Section 3 of this Act a part of its public record. Governmental 17units receiving revenue of less than $1,400,000 $850,000 shall 18immediately make one copy of the audit report, or one copy of 19the report authorized by Section 3 of this Act to be filed 20instead of the audit report, a part of its public record. These 21copies shall be open to public inspection. In addition, the 22governmental unit shall file one copy of the report with the 23Comptroller and with the county clerk of the county in which 24the principal office of the governmental unit is located. A 25governmental unit may, in filing its audit report with the   SB2836 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 17498 RTM 30924 b1Comptroller, transmit with such report any comment or 2explanation that it wishes to make concerning the report.3(Source: P.A. 101-419, eff. 1-1-20.) 4    Section 10. The Township Code is amended by changing 5Section 80-20 as follows: 6    (60 ILCS 1/80-20)7    Sec. 80-20. Independent audit of accounts. 8    (a) All accounts audited under this Article (and those 9rejected, if any) shall be delivered with the certificate of 10the trustees (or a majority of them) to the township clerk, who 11shall keep them on file for the inspection of any of the 12inhabitants of the township. They shall also be produced by 13the township clerk at the next annual meeting and shall be read 14at the meeting by the clerk.15    (b) In townships that receive revenue of more than 16$1,400,000 for any fiscal year, with the amount to increase or 17decrease by a percentage equal to the Consumer Price Index-U 18as reported on January 1 of each year $850,000 or more during 19any fiscal year, exclusive of road funds, the township board 20shall have the accounts and all records of the township 21thoroughly audited by a certified public accountant within 6 22months after the close of each fiscal year. The board shall 23have a copy of the accountant's report and recommendations 24filed with the township clerk and another copy filed with the   SB2836 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 17498 RTM 30924 b1county clerk for public inspection.2    (c) In townships that receive revenue of less than 3$1,400,000 for any fiscal year, with the amount to increase or 4decrease by a percentage equal to the Consumer Price Index-U 5as reported on January 1 of each year $850,000 during any 6fiscal year, exclusive of road funds, the township board shall 7have the accounts and all records of the township audited and 8inspected by an independent auditing committee composed of 3 9township electors chosen by the board. The audit shall be 10completed within 6 months after the close of each fiscal year. 11A copy of the auditing committee's report and recommendations 12shall be filed with the township clerk and another copy shall 13be filed with the county clerk for public inspection. The 14auditing committee shall not contain any member of the 15township board or any person related to a trustee. Members of 16the auditing committee shall be proficient in accounting 17principles and practices and shall be compensated at a rate 18determined by the township board but not to exceed $50 per day. 19In addition to the other audit requirements imposed by law, in 20townships subject to this subsection, the township board shall 21have the accounts and all records of the township thoroughly 22audited by a certified public accountant within 6 months after 23(i) the end of each term of office of the township supervisor 24and (ii) a vacancy occurs in the office of township 25supervisor. A copy of the accountant's report and 26recommendations shall be filed with the township clerk and   SB2836 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 17498 RTM 30924 b1another copy shall be filed with the county clerk for public 2inspection.3    As used in this Section, "Consumer Price Index-U" means 4the index published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the 5United States Department of Labor that measures the average 6change in prices of goods and services purchased by all urban 7consumers, United States city average, all items, 1982-84 = 8100. 9(Source: P.A. 92-582, eff. 7-1-02.) 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.